North Carolina, session 2025, HB653.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 108A-54.3C reads as rewritten:
"§ 108A-54.3C. NC Health Works federal financial participation.
(a) As used in this section, the term "newly eligible individual" has the same meaning as
in 42 C.F.R. § 433.204.
(b) If the federal medical assistance percentage for Medicaid coverage provided to the
category of individuals described G.S. 108A-54.3A(a)(24) newly eligible individuals falls below
ninety percent (90%) the federal medical assistance percentage for Medicaid coverage provided
to individuals who are not newly eligible individuals, then Medicaid coverage for this category
of the individuals described in G.S. 108A-54.3A(a)(24) shall be discontinued as expeditiously as
possible but no earlier than the date the lower federal medical assistance percentage takes effect.
Upon receipt of information indicating that the federal medical assistance percentage for
Medicaid coverage provided to newly eligible individuals will be lower than ninety percent
(90%), the federal medical assistance percentage for Medicaid coverage provided to individuals
who are not newly eligible individuals, the Secretary shall promptly do all of the following:
(1) Notify the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid, the Office of
State Budget and Management, and the Fiscal Research Division of the
determination and post this notice on the Department's website. The notice
must include the proposed effective date of the discontinuation of coverage.
(2) Submit all documents to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
necessary to discontinue Medicaid coverage for the category of individuals
described in G.S. 108A-54.3A(a)(24)."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H653-v-1*